Illinois, session 104th, HB3164.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Emergency Telephone System Act is amended 5by changing Sections 15.3 and 15.3a as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 750/15.3)  (from Ch. 134, par. 45.3)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2025)8    Sec. 15.3. Local non-wireless surcharge.9    (a) Except as provided in subsection (l) of this Section, 10the corporate authorities of any municipality or any county 11may, subject to the limitations of subsections (c), (d), and 12(h), and in addition to any tax levied pursuant to the 13Simplified Municipal Telecommunications Tax Act, impose a 14monthly surcharge on billed subscribers of network connection 15provided by telecommunication carriers engaged in the business 16of transmitting messages by means of electricity originating 17within the corporate limits of the municipality or county 18imposing the surcharge at a rate per network connection 19determined in accordance with subsection (c), however the 20monthly surcharge shall not apply to a network connection 21provided for use with pay telephone services. Provided, 22however, that where multiple voice grade communications 23channels are connected between the subscriber's premises and a   HB3164 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 11084 HLH 21166 b1public switched network through private branch exchange (PBX) 2or centrex type service, a municipality imposing a surcharge 3at a rate per network connection, as determined in accordance 4with this Act, shall impose: 5        (i) in a municipality with a population of 500,000 or 6    less or in any county, 5 such surcharges per network 7    connection, as defined under Section 2 of this Act, for 8    both regular service and advanced service provisioned 9    trunk lines;10        (ii) in a municipality with a population, prior to 11    March 1, 2010, of 500,000 or more, 5 surcharges per 12    network connection, as defined under Section 2 of this 13    Act, for both regular service and advanced service 14    provisioned trunk lines;15        (iii) in a municipality with a population, as of March 16    1, 2010, of 500,000 or more, 5 surcharges per network 17    connection, as defined under Section 2 of this Act, for 18    regular service provisioned trunk lines, and 12 surcharges 19    per network connection, as defined under Section 2 of this 20    Act, for advanced service provisioned trunk lines, except 21    where an advanced service provisioned trunk line supports 22    at least 2 but fewer than 23 simultaneous voice grade 23    calls ("VGC's"), a telecommunication carrier may elect to 24    impose fewer than 12 surcharges per trunk line as provided 25    in subsection (iv) of this Section; or26        (iv) for an advanced service provisioned trunk line   HB3164 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 11084 HLH 21166 b1    connected between the subscriber's premises and the public 2    switched network through a P.B.X., where the advanced 3    service provisioned trunk line is capable of transporting 4    at least 2 but fewer than 23 simultaneous VGC's per trunk 5    line, the telecommunications carrier collecting the 6    surcharge may elect to impose surcharges in accordance 7    with the table provided in this Section, without limiting 8    any telecommunications carrier's obligations to otherwise 9    keep and maintain records. Any telecommunications carrier 10    electing to impose fewer than 12 surcharges per an 11    advanced service provisioned trunk line shall keep and 12    maintain records adequately to demonstrate the VGC 13    capability of each advanced service provisioned trunk line 14    with fewer than 12 surcharges imposed, provided that 12 15    surcharges shall be imposed on an advanced service 16    provisioned trunk line regardless of the VGC capability 17    where a telecommunications carrier cannot demonstrate the 18    VGC capability of the advanced service provisioned trunk 19    line.  20Facility VGC's 911 Surcharges 21Advanced service provisioned trunk line 18-23 12 22Advanced service provisioned trunk line 12-17 10 23Advanced service provisioned trunk line 2-11 8  24    Subsections (i), (ii), (iii), and (iv) are not intended to   HB3164 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 11084 HLH 21166 b1make any change in the meaning of this Section, but are 2intended to remove possible ambiguity, thereby confirming the 3intent of paragraph (a) as it existed prior to and following 4the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 97th General 5Assembly. 6    For mobile telecommunications services, if a surcharge is 7imposed it shall be imposed based upon the municipality or 8county that encompasses the customer's place of primary use as 9defined in the Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Conformity 10Act. A municipality may enter into an intergovernmental 11agreement with any county in which it is partially located, 12when the county has adopted an ordinance to impose a surcharge 13as provided in subsection (c), to include that portion of the 14municipality lying outside the county in that county's 15surcharge referendum. If the county's surcharge referendum is 16approved, the portion of the municipality identified in the 17intergovernmental agreement shall automatically be 18disconnected from the county in which it lies and connected to 19the county which approved the referendum for purposes of a 20surcharge on telecommunications carriers.21    (b) For purposes of computing the surcharge imposed by 22subsection (a), the network connections to which the surcharge 23shall apply shall be those in-service network connections, 24other than those network connections assigned to the 25municipality or county, where the service address for each 26such network connection or connections is located within the   HB3164 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 11084 HLH 21166 b1corporate limits of the municipality or county levying the 2surcharge. Except for mobile telecommunication services, the 3"service address" shall mean the location of the primary use 4of the network connection or connections. For mobile 5telecommunication services, "service address" means the 6customer's place of primary use as defined in the Mobile 7Telecommunications Sourcing Conformity Act.8    (c) Upon the passage of an ordinance to impose a surcharge 9under this Section the clerk of the municipality or county 10shall certify the question of whether the surcharge may be 11imposed to the proper election authority who shall submit the 12public question to the electors of the municipality or county 13in accordance with the general election law; provided that 14such question shall not be submitted at a consolidated primary 15election. The public question shall be in substantially the 16following form:17---------------------------------------------- 18    Shall the county (or city, village 19or incorporated town) of ..... impose          YES 20a surcharge of up to ...¢ per month per 21network connection, which surcharge will 22be added to the monthly bill you receive   ------------------ 23for telephone or telecommunications 24charges, for the purpose of installing 25(or improving) a 9-1-1 Emergency               NO 26Telephone System? HB3164 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 11084 HLH 21166 b1-------------------------------------------------------------2    If a majority of the votes cast upon the public question 3are in favor thereof, the surcharge shall be imposed.4    However, if a Joint Emergency Telephone System Board is to 5be created pursuant to an intergovernmental agreement under 6Section 15.4, the ordinance to impose the surcharge shall be 7subject to the approval of a majority of the total number of 8votes cast upon the public question by the electors of all of 9the municipalities or counties, or combination thereof, that 10are parties to the intergovernmental agreement.11    The referendum requirement of this subsection (c) shall 12not apply to any municipality with a population over 500,000 13or to any county in which a proposition as to whether a 14sophisticated 9-1-1 Emergency Telephone System should be 15installed in the county, at a cost not to exceed a specified 16monthly amount per network connection, has previously been 17approved by a majority of the electors of the county voting on 18the proposition at an election conducted before the effective 19date of this amendatory Act of 1987.20    (d) A county may not impose a surcharge, unless requested 21by a municipality, in any incorporated area which has 22previously approved a surcharge as provided in subsection (c) 23or in any incorporated area where the corporate authorities of 24the municipality have previously entered into a binding 25contract or letter of intent with a telecommunications carrier 26to provide sophisticated 9-1-1 service through municipal   HB3164 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 11084 HLH 21166 b1funds.2    (e) A municipality or county may at any time by ordinance 3change the rate of the surcharge imposed under this Section if 4the new rate does not exceed the rate specified in the 5referendum held pursuant to subsection (c).6    (f) The surcharge authorized by this Section shall be 7collected from the subscriber by the telecommunications 8carrier providing the subscriber the network connection as a 9separately stated item on the subscriber's bill.10    (g) The amount of surcharge collected by the 11telecommunications carrier shall be paid to the particular 12municipality or county or Joint Emergency Telephone System 13Board not later than 30 days after the surcharge is collected, 14net of any network or other 9-1-1 or sophisticated 9-1-1 15system charges then due the particular telecommunications 16carrier, as shown on an itemized bill. The telecommunications 17carrier collecting the surcharge shall also be entitled to 18deduct 3% of the gross amount of surcharge collected to 19reimburse the telecommunications carrier for the expense of 20accounting and collecting the surcharge.21    (h) Except as expressly provided in subsection (a) of this 22Section, on or after the effective date of this amendatory Act 23of the 98th General Assembly and until December 31, 2017, a 24municipality with a population of 500,000 or more shall not 25impose a monthly surcharge per network connection in excess of 26the highest monthly surcharge imposed as of January 1, 2014 by   HB3164 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 11084 HLH 21166 b1any county or municipality under subsection (c) of this 2Section. Beginning January 1, 2018 and until December 31, 2027 3December 31, 2025, a municipality with a population over 4500,000 may not impose a monthly surcharge in excess of $5.00 5per network connection. On or after January 1, 2028 January 1, 62026, a municipality with a population over 500,000 may not 7impose a monthly surcharge in excess of $2.50 per network 8connection.9    (i) Any municipality or county or joint emergency 10telephone system board that has imposed a surcharge pursuant 11to this Section prior to the effective date of this amendatory 12Act of 1990 shall hereafter impose the surcharge in accordance 13with subsection (b) of this Section.14    (j) The corporate authorities of any municipality or 15county may issue, in accordance with Illinois law, bonds, 16notes or other obligations secured in whole or in part by the 17proceeds of the surcharge described in this Section. The State 18of Illinois pledges and agrees that it will not limit or alter 19the rights and powers vested in municipalities and counties by 20this Section to impose the surcharge so as to impair the terms 21of or affect the security for bonds, notes or other 22obligations secured in whole or in part with the proceeds of 23the surcharge described in this Section. The pledge and 24agreement set forth in this Section survive the termination of 25the surcharge under subsection (l) by virtue of the 26replacement of the surcharge monies guaranteed under Section   HB3164 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 11084 HLH 21166 b120; the State of Illinois pledges and agrees that it will not 2limit or alter the rights vested in municipalities and 3counties to the surcharge replacement funds guaranteed under 4Section 20 so as to impair the terms of or affect the security 5for bonds, notes or other obligations secured in whole or in 6part with the proceeds of the surcharge described in this 7Section. 8    (k) Any surcharge collected by or imposed on a 9telecommunications carrier pursuant to this Section shall be 10held to be a special fund in trust for the municipality, county 11or Joint Emergency Telephone Board imposing the surcharge. 12Except for the 3% deduction provided in subsection (g) above, 13the special fund shall not be subject to the claims of 14creditors of the telecommunication carrier.15    (l) Any surcharge imposed pursuant to this Section by a 16county or municipality, other than a municipality with a 17population in excess of 500,000, shall cease to be imposed on 18January 1, 2016. 19(Source: P.A. 102-9, eff. 6-3-21; 103-366, eff. 1-1-24.) 20    (50 ILCS 750/15.3a)21    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2025)22    Sec. 15.3a. Local wireless surcharge.23    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, a 24unit of local government or emergency telephone system board 25providing wireless 9-1-1 service and imposing and collecting a   HB3164 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 11084 HLH 21166 b1wireless carrier surcharge prior to July 1, 1998 may continue 2its practices of imposing and collecting its wireless carrier 3surcharge, but, except as provided in subsection (b) of this 4Section, in no event shall that monthly surcharge exceed $2.50 5per commercial mobile radio service (CMRS) connection or 6in-service telephone number billed on a monthly basis. For 7mobile telecommunications services provided on and after 8August 1, 2002, any surcharge imposed shall be imposed based 9upon the municipality or county that encompasses the 10customer's place of primary use as defined in the Mobile 11Telecommunications Sourcing Conformity Act. 12    (b) Until December 31, 2017, the corporate authorities of 13a municipality with a population in excess of 500,000 on the 14effective date of this amendatory Act of the 99th General 15Assembly may by ordinance continue to impose and collect a 16monthly surcharge per commercial mobile radio service (CMRS) 17connection or in-service telephone number billed on a monthly 18basis that does not exceed the highest monthly surcharge 19imposed as of January 1, 2014 by any county or municipality 20under subsection (c) of Section 15.3 of this Act. Beginning 21January 1, 2018, and until December 31, 2027 December 31, 222025, a municipality with a population in excess of 500,000 23may by ordinance continue to impose and collect a monthly 24surcharge per commercial mobile radio service (CMRS) 25connection or in-service telephone number billed on a monthly 26basis that does not exceed $5.00. On or after January 1, 2028   HB3164 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 11084 HLH 21166 b1January 1, 2026, the municipality may continue imposing and 2collecting its wireless carrier surcharge as provided in and 3subject to the limitations of subsection (a) of this Section. 4    (c) In addition to any other lawful purpose, a 5municipality with a population over 500,000 may use the moneys 6collected under this Section for any anti-terrorism or 7emergency preparedness measures, including, but not limited 8to, preparedness planning, providing local matching funds for 9federal or State grants, personnel training, and specialized 10equipment, including surveillance cameras, as needed to deal 11with natural and terrorist-inspired emergency situations or 12events. 13(Source: P.A. 102-9, eff. 6-3-21; 103-366, eff. 1-1-24.) 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.